ca/dictionaries/ca-valencia.dic
aburgesin/_C
acomboie/_D
acusem/_C
adelitament/_E_V_Y
adjectivador/_F_V_Y
admeti/_D
afaeneu/_C
afectació/_G_V_Y
aferragós/_I_V_Y
afàs/_i_V_Y
aiguabata/_D
aiguamoix/_I_V_Y
aiguavés/_i_V_Y
ajupim/_C
albellatge/_E_V_Y
albuferenc/_F_V_Y
alficòs/_i_V_Y
alpax/_I_V_Y
al·lergització/_G_V_Y
amfidiartrosi/_E_V_Y
amfipròtic/_F_V_Y
anisolecític/_F_V_Y
anomocromia/_E_V_Y
antianticòs/_i_V_Y
antiinfecciós/_I_V_Y
antitrombòtic/_F_V_Y
antracitització/_G_V_Y
aporraid/_E_V_Y
apropinqua/_D
apropinqüem/_C
arboç/_I_V_Y
arcabús/_i_V_Y
arneser/_F_V_Y
ascidioide/_E_V_Y
atalaien/_C
atans/_I_V_Y
atenyi/_D
audiogènic/_F_V_Y
auscultació/_G_V_Y
autotrepanació/_G_V_Y
autozero/_E_V_Y
avanç/_I_V_Y
avesar/_v_Y_C
bagàs/_i
balç/_I
barbulli/_D
barbís/_i
baronívol/_F
basquisme/_E
becgròs/_i
benuecongolès/_I
bereneu/_C
betatró/_G
biogàs/_I
biològic/_F
bisellament/_E
bordís/_i
botxí/_G
boç/_I
bressa/_D
brogit/_E
brumint/_C
bruníssim/_F
cabeç/_I
cabàs/_i
calciotèrmia/_E
callís/_i
camis/_I
canemàs/_i
cantabrià/_G
cantàbric/_F
capgròs/_i
carcaix/_I
carcinogenicitat/_E
carrasquís/_i
cartenint/_C
cartindre/_D
catoliquíssim/_F
cefminox/_I
ceftriaxona/_E
cegó/_G
cistelcosi/_E
climatitzador/_F
clorsuló/_G
clos/_I
clou/_C
codolís/_i
coescriga/_D
colagògia/_E
commovent/_C
complesca/_D
compàs/_i
comís/_I
concatenació/_G
concloguen/_C
confonga/_D
congènere/_E
conillet/_F
consentiu/_C
contrafaça/_D
contrafem/_C
contraprestació/_G
convén/_C
coresforç/_I
corfonga/_D
corser/_E
cotxàs/_i
creguen/_C
criptògam/_F
cristal·lització/_G
cuiram/_E
cunç/_I
càpiga/_D
damàs/_i
decorreguem/_C
delaminació/_G
dendrodendrític/_F
denunciant/_E
deprenga/_D
dervix/_I
desaiguar/_C
desavín/_C
descase/_D
desconfiguració/_G
descorreu/_C
descusa/_D
desembaràs/_i
desempesem/_C
desentravessa/_D
desfaenau/_C
desglaç/_I
desguàs/_i
desmenteixi/_D
desmereix/_C
desnidació/_G
despèn/_C
desteixeixi/_D
desveseu/_C
desviure/_D
dextrocàrdia/_E
dextròtop/_F
dibenzantracè/_G
distomia/_E
distraga/_D
distòcic/_F
divís/_I
dormim/_C
dosificació/_G
efemèride/_E_V_Y
electrocutador/_F_V_Y
embaràs/_i_V_Y
emmaressa/_D
empapatx/_I_V_Y
emunció/_G_V_Y
enciamada/_E_V_Y
encobrir/_v_Y_C
encobrisca/_D
endreçadíssim/_F_V_Y
engargús/_i_V_Y
engreix/_I_V_Y
entenga/_D
entrefereix/_C
entreni/_D
envase/_D
enxís/_I_V_Y
enòcoa/_E_V_Y
equivalent/_v_Y_C
eritrofàgic/_F_V_Y
escadús/_i_V_Y
esciagrama/_E_V_Y
escreix/_I_V_Y
esculla/_D
escó/_G_V_Y
espasant/_v_Y_C
espina-xoca/_E_V_Y
esplaie/_D
esplugador/_F_V_Y
espès/_i_V_Y
esquetx/_I_V_Y
estolidobranquiat/_E_V_Y
estrenyi/_D
estrényer/_v_Y_C
etofenprox/_I_V_Y
etè/_G_V_Y
eucarístic/_F_V_Y
excés/_i_V_Y
expansionista/_E_V_Y
extinció/_G_V_Y
faener/_F
fengui/_D
fenticlor/_E
fenàs/_i
ferrobús/_I
filopressió/_G
finançador/_F
flix/_I
fluorita/_E
fotoplà/_G
fototípic/_F
fracàs/_i
fregiu/_C
frissa/_D
fuita/_E
fus/_I
garrés/_I
gastroepiploic/_F
gelatiniforme/_E
generalització/_G
girocompàs/_i
goix/_I
gonidi/_E
gonorreic/_F
granís/_i
guardabraç/_I
guetització/_G
hectogram/_E_V_Y
hemostàtic/_F_V_Y
heteroanticòs/_i_V_Y
hiperexcitació/_G_Y
hipnogènic/_F_V_Y
hipocromatisme/_E_V_Y
iconògraf/_F_V_Y
immortificació/_G_Y
inadmeta/_D
incorreu/_C
ineducació/_G_Y
ineludible/_E_V_Y
infix/_I_V_Y
infoaddicte/_F_V_Y
ingrés/_i_V_Y
interiorització/_G_Y
intervinga/_D
isoanticòs/_i_V_Y
isobàtic/_F_V_Y
judicialització/_G
kip/_E
leucorreic/_F
llambroix/_I
llanvirnià/_G
llegim/_C
lleure/_D
lluç/_I
lobel·lar/_E
longistil/_F
malmetre/_D
malrubí/_G
malvapeix/_I
malvolent/_C
marejador/_F
marfondre/_D
marranís/_i
marès/_I
matalàs/_i
melifàgid/_E
mesiooclusió/_G
mesopsíquic/_F
metatars/_I
microabscés/_i
mirallenc/_F
mirlitó/_G
mitjacerilla/_E
mix/_I
molga/_D
monjoieu/_C
morfoplàstic/_F
mossardàs/_i
nadó/_G
napís/_i
neopúnic/_F
nesidioma/_E
neurogàs/_I
obliqüi/_D
obsecració/_G_V_Y
ocellàs/_i_V_Y
ocronòtic/_F_V_Y
ofereix/_C
ometa/_D
optodinamòmetre/_E_V_Y
orotx/_I_V_Y
ortogràfic/_F_V_Y
oï/_D
padrí/_G
panadís/_i
parador/_F
paratge/_E
partidàs/_i
pastitx/_I
pedallàs/_i
penelló/_G
percalluç/_I
percebi/_D
percut/_C
perdonador/_F
pervingui/_D
pinyonet/_E
pinçanàs/_i
pirè/_G
plus/_I
polisintètic/_F
positivació/_G
possés/_i
postura/_E
prediquem/_C
prediqui/_D
pretendre/_D
pretensió/_G
processen/_C
progrés/_i
psammític/_F
psicoreacció/_G
purgament/_E
raigràs/_i
ramosetró/_G
rapaç/_I
readmeti/_D
reafegim/_C
reconeguen/_C
recresqui/_D
recés/_i
reexaminació/_G
refoneu/_C
relaix/_I
relisser/_E
rellija/_D
rellonejador/_F
reneixin/_C
replicó/_G
repàs/_i
restrenyi/_D
reteixeixin/_C
revessar/_C
revestisca/_D
ribotipificació/_G
rés/_I
salsalat/_E
sargàs/_i
secardinenc/_F
sectorització/_G
siguen/_C
sinemurià/_G
sobreentrena/_D
sobrevinguem/_C
socarrimada/_E
solaç/_I
solteràs/_i
somriure/_D
sotaigüin/_C
subcrepitació/_G
subdèrmic/_F
talòs/_i
taumetopeid/_E
terliç/_I
terraló/_G
terrandòs/_i
timbròfil/_F
tinga/_D
torcin/_C
toxialbúmina/_E
través/_i
tricomatós/_I
tusse/_D
tuïció/_G
té/_C
ulètic/_F_V_Y
uniplanar/_E_V_Y
xaiem/_C
xancleta/_E
xassís/_i
xiconiu/_F
xoriç/_I
